Maryland, session 2026, HB0691.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 10–1701 and 10–1702 and the subtitle “Subtitle 17. Miscellaneous” of
Article – State Government of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be
Section(s) 10–1801 and 10–1802, respectively, and the subtitle “Subtitle 18. Miscellaneous”.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – State Government
SUBTITLE 17. PERMITTING EFFICIENCY FOR HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS.
10–1701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT” MEANS THE NEW CONSTRUCTION
OR SUBSTANTIAL RENOVATION OF A RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE PROJECT.
(C) (1) “PERMIT RELATED TO HOUSING CONSTRUCTION” MEANS A
PERMIT OR AN APPROVAL REQUIRED BY LAW OR REGULATION TO BE ISSUED BY A
UNIT IN THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT TO A DEVELOPER,
CONTRACTOR, OR SUBCONTRACTOR IN ORDER TO COMMENCE, CONTINUE, OR
SUPPORT A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT.
(2) “PERMIT RELATED TO HOUSING CONSTRUCTION” INCLUDES A
PERMIT OR AN APPROVAL RELATED TO THE CONSTRUCTION OR EXPANSION OF
SUPPORTIVE INFRASTRUCTURE SERVING A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT.
(D) “STATE HOUSING OMBUDSMAN” MEANS THE INDIVIDUAL DESIGNATED
BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT TO
FACILITATE NAVIGATION THROUGH LOCAL, STATE, AND FEDERAL PERMITTING
PROCESSES.
10–1702.
(A) EACH UNIT IN THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT THAT
IS RESPONSIBLE FOR ISSUING A PERMIT RELATED TO HOUSING CONSTRUCTION
SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES TO STREAMLINE THE PERMITTING PROCESS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 691 3
(B) A STREAMLINED PERMITTING PROCESS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL, AT A MINIMUM:
(1) TO THE EXTENT FEASIBLE, ALLOW FOR THE CONCURRENT FILING
AND ADJUDICATION OF MULTIPLE PERMITS OR APPROVALS RELATED TO A
PARTICULAR HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT;
(2) IN CASES IN WHICH CONCURRENT FILING AND ADJUDICATION IS
NOT FEASIBLE, PROVIDE FOR THE PREDICTABLE SEQUENCING OF FILINGS AND
ADJUDICATIONS; AND
(3) ESTABLISH A FRAMEWORK THAT ALLOWS FOR THE EXPEDITED
REVIEW OF PERMITS RELATED TO HOUSING CONSTRUCTION, INCLUDING CLEAR
ESCALATION AND PRIORITIZATION PATHWAYS.
(C) IN DEVELOPING A STREAMLINED PERMITTING PROCESS UNDER THIS
SECTION, A UNIT SHALL CONSULT WITH:
(1) THE UNIT’S PERMITTING OPERATIONS STAFF;
(2) RELEVANT STAKEHOLDERS, INCLUDING ENTITIES THAT
FREQUENTLY APPLY FOR PERMITS; AND
(3) THE STATE HOUSING OMBUDSMAN.
(D) TO THE EXTENT FEASIBLE, THE STATE HOUSING OMBUDSMAN SHALL
ENSURE CONSISTENCY BETWEEN THE STREAMLINED PERMITTING PROCESSES
DEVELOPED BY DIFFERENT UNITS UNDER THIS SECTION.
10–1703.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A UNIT IN THE
EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT MAY, BY AGREEMENT WITH A COUNTY
OR MUNICIPALITY, DELEGATE TO AN APPROPRIATE LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL UNIT
ANY TASK RELATED TO THE REVIEW OR APPROVAL OF PERMITS RELATED TO
HOUSING CONSTRUCTION WITHIN THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That on or before December 1,
2027, the State Housing Ombudsman within the Department of Housing and Community
Development shall report to the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the
Environment and the House Government, Labor, and Elections Committee, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the development and implementation of
the streamlined permitting processes required by this Act.

HOUSE BILL 691
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.